Hawaii statutes.
§286-106 Expiration of licenses.
Every driver's license issued under this part, except for a provisional license
issued under section 286-102.6 which shall expire on the date of the
provisional licensee's nineteenth birthday, whether an original issuance or a
renewal, shall expire on the first birthday of the licensee occurring not less
than eight years after the date of the issuance of the license, unless sooner
revoked or suspended; provided that:

(1) The license shall expire on the first birthday of
the licensee occurring not less than four years after the date of the issuance
if, at the time, the licensee is twenty-four years of age or younger;

(2) The license shall expire on the first birthday of
the licensee occurring not less than two years after the date of the issuance
of the license if, at that time, the licensee is seventy-two years of age or
older; and

(3) If the licensee is a legal immigrant, the license
shall expire no later than the licensee's authorized period of stay in the
United States.

The examiner of drivers may issue a license for
a shorter period if the licensee has a physical condition or conditions that
the examiner of drivers reasonably believes may impair the driver's ability to
drive. [L 1967, c 214, pt of §2; HRS §286-106; am L 1970, c 164, §1(2) and §3;
am L 1974, c 97, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 296, §1; am L 1997, c 60, §1 and
c 330, §3; am L 2005, c 72, §§4, 15; am L 2008, c 50, §§2, 4; am L 2010, c 38,
§§2, 6 and c 85, §2]

Law Journals and Reviews

Driving into the Sunset: A Proposal for Mandatory Reporting
to the DMV by Physicians Treating Unsafe Elderly Drivers. 25 UH L. Rev. 59.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next